Utah statutes.
72-11-110.   Bonds -- Negotiability -- Tax exemption except corporate franchise tax.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter are negotiable instruments except when registered in the name of a registered owner and all the bonds, and the interest or income therefrom, are exempt from all taxation in the state, except for the corporate franchise tax.

